District of Columbia statutes.
3-414

Services requiring direct supervision by funeral director.

The handling, preparation, or embalming of human remains which carried infectious or contagious diseases must at all times be done by a licensed funeral director, or in the case of an apprentice funeral director, under the direct supervision of a licensed funeral director.

May 22, 1984, D.C. Law 5-84, § 15, 31 DCR 1815
1981 Ed., § 2-2814.